Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 67 Trafficking of Persons and Involuntary Servitude

11-67-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 217, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 18, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 1, effective July 19, 2017.

11-67-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 217, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 188, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 192, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 18, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 1, effective July 19, 2017.

11-67-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 217, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 18, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 1, effective July 19, 2017.

11-67-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 217, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 18, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 1, effective July 19, 2017.

11-67-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2007, ch. 123, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 217, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 18, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 1, effective July 19, 2017.

11-67-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 192, § 2; P.L. 2015, ch. 42, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 45, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 18, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 1, effective July 19, 2017.

11-67-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 192, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 18, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 1, effective July 19, 2017.

11-67-8.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 188, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 192, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2017, ch. 232, § 1, effective July 18, 2017; P.L. 2017, ch. 260, § 1, effective July 19, 2017.